hr-HR: Orijentacija perja strijele: Lijeva spirala; Lijevo krilo; Desna spirala; Desno krilo; Ravno; Ostalo
el: Κατεύθυνση πτερώματος βέλους: Αριστερό ελικοειδές; Αριστερό φτερό; Δεξιό ελικοειδές; Δεξιό φτερό; Ίσιο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 箭羽方向: 左旋螺旋; 左翼; 右旋螺旋; 右翼; 直羽; 其他
hu: Nyíl tollazatának iránya: Balos csavarású; Balszárnyas; Jobbos csavarású; Jobbszárnyas; Egyenes; Egyéb
ja: 矢羽の向き: 左ヘリカル; 左羽; 右ヘリカル; 右羽; ストレート; その他
pt-BR: Orientação da plumagem da flecha: Helicoidal esquerda; Asa esquerda; Helicoidal direita; Asa direita; Reta; Outro
fr: Orientation de l’empennage de flèche: Hélicoïdal gauche; Aîle gauche; Hélicoïdal droite; Aîle droite; Droit; Autre
pt-PT: Orientação da emplumagem da flecha: Helicoidal esquerda; Asa esquerda; Helicoidal direita; Asa direita; Reta; Outros
sv: Pilens fletchingsorientering: Vänster helikal; Vänstervingad; Höger helikal; Högervingad; Rak; Annat
fi: Nuolen sulituskuvio: Vasen kierre; Vasen siipi; Oikea kierre; Oikea siipi; Suora; Muu
zh-CN: 箭羽方向: 左螺旋; 左翼; 右螺旋; 右翼; 直羽; 其他
nl: Pijlveren oriëntatie: Links helisch; Linkervleugel; Rechts helisch; Rechtervleugel; Recht; Overige
es: Orientación del emplumado de la flecha: Helicoidal izquierda; Ala izquierda; Helicoidal derecha; Ala derecha; Recta; Otra
en: Arrow fletching orientation: Left helical; Left-wing; Right helical; Right-wing; Straight; Other
ro-RO: Orientarea aripilor săgeții: Elicoidal stânga; Aripă stângă; Elicoidal dreapta; Aripă dreaptă; Drept; Altele
bg-BG: Ориентация на оперението на стрелата: Лява спирала; Ляво крило; Дясна спирала; Дясно крило; Право; Друго
lt-LT: Strėlės plunksnelių orientacija: Kairinė spiralinė; Kairiojo sparno; Dešininė spiralinė; Dešiniojo sparno; Tiesi; Kita
ko: 화살깃 방향: 좌측 헬리컬; 좌측 날개; 우측 헬리컬; 우측 날개; 일자형; 기타
cs: Orientace operení šípu: Levá spirála; Levé křídlo; Pravá spirála; Pravé křídlo; Rovná; Ostatní
sl-SI: Orientacija peres puščice: Leva spirala; Levo krilo; Desna spirala; Desno krilo; Ravna; Drugo
th: ทิศทางการจัดวางปีกลูกธนู: เกลียวซ้าย; ปีกซ้าย; เกลียวขวา; ปีกขวา; ตรง; อื่นๆ
nb: Pilfletching-orientering: Venstreskrudd; Venstrevinge; Høyreskrudd; Høyrevinge; Rett; Annet
da: Retning af pilens fjer: Venstresnoet; Venstrevinge; Højresnoet; Højrevinge; Lige; Andet
ru: Ориентация оперения стрелы: Левая спираль; Левое перо; Правая спираль; Правое перо; Прямое; Другое
tr: Ok kanatçık yönü: Sol sarmal; Sol kanat; Sağ sarmal; Sağ kanat; Düz; Diğer
it: Orientamento delle alette della freccia: Elicoidale sinistra; Ala sinistra; Elicoidale destra; Ala destra; Dritta; Altro
pl: Orientacja lotek strzały: Lewoskrętne helikalne; Lewe skrzydło; Prawoskrętne helikalne; Prawe skrzydło; Proste; Inne
de: Ausrichtung der Pfeilbefiederung: Linkshelikal; Linksflügel; Rechtshelikal; Rechtsflügel; Gerade; Sonstige
vi: Hướng lông đuôi tên: Xoắn trái; Cánh trái; Xoắn phải; Cánh phải; Thẳng; Khác
sk-SK: Orientácia pierok na šípe: Ľavotočivá špirála; Ľavé krídlo; Pravotočivá špirála; Pravé krídlo; Rovné; Iné